California, session 20252026, AB1123.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44210 of the Education Code is amended to read:44210. (a) There is hereby established in the state government the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, to consist of 15 voting members, 14 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, as specified in paragraphs (2) to (9), inclusive. The commission shall consist of the following members:(1) The Superintendent or the Superintendent’s designee.(2) (A) Six practicing teachers from public elementary and secondary schools in California, except as provided in subparagraph (B).(B) Of the six members appointed pursuant to this paragraph, one member may be a teacher holding a commission-issued child development teacher permit who teaches at a state-funded preschool program or prekindergarten program licensed pursuant to Chapter 19 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.(3) One person who is employed on the basis of a services credential other than an administrative services credential.(4) One member of the governing board of a school district.(5) One early childhood faculty member representing the early childhood higher education systems who teaches at either (A) an early childhood or child development baccalaureate degree program at one of the California State University or University of California campuses or (B) an associate degree program in one of the California Community Colleges’ early childhood education programs. The Governor shall make the initial appointment pursuant to this paragraph upon the occurrence of the first vacancy of a public representative position, as described in paragraph (6), that occurs on or after January 1, 2026. (6)  Three representatives of the public, until the first vacancy of a member appointed pursuant to this paragraph that occurs on or after January 1, 2026, after which there shall be two representatives of the public. The occurrence of this vacancy shall not affect the status of the remaining two public representatives that had previously been appointed. None of these persons shall have been employed by an elementary or secondary school district in a position requiring certification, or shall have served as a school district governing board member in the five-year period immediately before the public member’s appointment to the commission.(7) One school administrator in a public elementary or secondary school in California.(8) One certificated human resources administrator in a public elementary or secondary school in California.(9) One faculty member from a college or university that grants baccalaureate degrees.(b) With the exception of the representatives of the public and the Superintendent, the appointment of a member shall terminate if the member is no longer a practicing teacher in a public elementary or secondary school or a teacher holding a commission-issued child development permit as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), a person who is employed on the basis of a valid services credential, a school administrator, a certificated human resources administrator, a faculty member of a college or university that grants baccalaureate degrees, a faculty member as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), or a member of the governing board of a school district, as may be the case, in California.(c) Not more than one member of the commission is to be appointed from the same school district or college or university campus.(d)  Commencing July 1, 1989, four members shall be appointed to the commission for terms of two years, five members for terms of three years, and five members for terms of four years.(e) Each appointment pursuant to this section shall expire on November 20 of the year of expiration of the applicable term. All appointments made pursuant to this section are subject to Section 44213.